ur.aff
SET UTF-8

# Urdu character frequency order for suggestion scoring
TRY اےیورٹیہکلمنبسقفغعظطضصشچجحخھدڈذڑزژٹپبآںؤئاث

# Similar-looking character groups for Damerau-Levenshtein suggestions
MAP 12
MAP اآع
MAP بپتث
MAP حخہھ
MAP دذڈزضظ
MAP رڑزژ
MAP سصث
MAP شچج
MAP طت
MAP عغ
MAP قک
MAP نں
MAP ويؤئےی

# Common Urdu spelling mistake replacements
REP 22
REP ا آ
REP ب پ
REP ت ط
REP ث س
REP ج چ
REP ح ھ
REP ح ہ
REP خ ھ
REP د ڈ
REP ذ ز
REP س ص
REP ش چ
REP ض ز
REP ط ت
REP ظ ز
REP ع ا
REP غ خ
REP ق ک
REP ک گ
REP ہ ھ
REP ی ے
REP ے ی

# Keep case — no Urdu word should be capitalized
KEEPCASE

# Compound word handling for hyphenated Urdu compounds
BREAK 1
BREAK -

# Word characters beyond the standard Unicode letter class
WORDCHARS ء-ي

# Prefix rules for productive derivational morphology
# بے- (be-) negation prefix: e.g., بے + فائدہ → بےفائدہ (useless)
PFX B N 1
PFX B 0 بے .

# نا- (nā-) negation prefix: e.g., نا + مناسب → نا مناسب (inappropriate)
PFX N N 1
PFX N 0 نا .

# لا- (lā-) without prefix: e.g., لا + تعلق → لاتعلق (unrelated)
PFX L N 1
PFX L 0 لا .

# با- (bā-) with prefix: e.g., با + عزت → باعزت (respectful)
PFX K N 1
PFX K 0 با .

# ہم- (ham-) co-prefix: e.g., ہم + وطن → ہم وطن (compatriot)
PFX M N 1
PFX M 0 ہم .

# Suffix rules for plural formation
# ات (āt) — Arabic feminine plural: e.g., طالبہ → طالبات
SFX T N 1
SFX T 0 ات .

# ین (yēn) — feminine plural: e.g., کتاب → کتابیں
SFX Y N 1
SFX Y 0 ین .

# ین (īn) — masculine rational plural: e.g., مسلمان → مسلمین
SFX I N 1
SFX I 0 ین .

# ں (ōn) — oblique plural: e.g., بچہ → بچوں
SFX O N 1
SFX O 0 ں .

# Suffix rules for derivational morphology
# ی (ī) — adjective/noun derivation: e.g., پاکستان → پاکستانی (Pakistani)
SFX J N 1
SFX J 0 ی .

# دار (dār) — possessor suffix: e.g., پردہ → پردہ دار (veiled)
SFX R N 1
SFX R 0 دار .

# کار (kār) — doer suffix: e.g., کام → کامکار (worker)
SFX U N 1
SFX U 0 کار .

# گار (gār) — doer suffix: e.g., وفا → وفاگار (loyal)
SFX G N 1
SFX G 0 گار .

# باز (bāz) — inclination suffix: e.g., جوئے → جوئے باز (gambler)
SFX Z N 1
SFX Z 0 باز .
